California, session 20252026, AB12.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39617.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39617.2. Notwithstanding any other law, the final regulation order of the state board to amend the Low-Carbon Fuel Standard regulations (Subarticle 7 (commencing with Section 95480) of Article 4 of Subchapter 10 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations) that amends Sections 95481, 95482, 95483, 95483.2, 95483.3, 95484, 95485, 95486, 95486.1, 95486.2, 95487, 95488, 95488.1, 95488.2, 95488.3, 95488.4, 95488.5, 95488.6, 95488.7, 95488.8, 95488.9, 95488.10, 95489, 95490, 95491, 95491.1, 95495, 95500, 95501, 95502, and 95503 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, as adopted on November 8, 2024, is hereby void.